Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB175.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 65-6902 is hereby amended to read as follows:
65-6902. As used in this act:
(a) "Board" means the state board of healing arts.
(b) "Athletic training" means the practice of injury prevention,
physical evaluation, emergency care and referral or physical
reconditioning relating to athletic activity, including, but not limited to,
sports participation, exercise, fitness training, strength and
conditioning work, recreational physical activities and competitive
athletics. "Athletic training" encompasses wellness promotion, risk
management, immediate or emergency care, examination, assessment
and therapeutic intervention or rehabilitation of athletic injury and
illness. Athletic training also means making clinical decisions to
determine if consultation or referrals are necessary, healthcare
administration, professional responsibility, performance of athletic
training research and educating and consulting with the public
regarding safe participation in athletic activities and proper training
methods.
(c) "Athletic trainer" means a person licensed under this act.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 65-6906 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
6906. (a) Applications for licensure as an athletic trainer shall be made
in writing to the board on a form and in the manner prescribed by the
board. Each application shall be accompanied by the required fee,
which shall not be refundable. Each application shall contain such
information necessary to enable the board to judge the qualifications of
the applicant for licensure.
(b) The applicant is entitled to licensure as an athletic trainer if the
applicant possesses the qualifications set forth under K.S.A. 65-6907,
and amendments thereto, pays the licensure fee established by the
board and has not committed an act which that constitutes ground for
denial of licensure.
(c) The board may issue a license as an athletic trainer without
examination to an applicant:
(1) Who presents evidence satisfactory to the board of being
licensed, registered or certified in another state, District of Columbia,
territory or foreign country and of having passed an examination in
athletic training before a similarly lawfully authorized examining board
in athletic training of another state, District of Columbia, territory or
foreign country if the standards for the examination and for licensure,
registration or certification in athletic training in such other state,
District of Columbia, territory or foreign country are determined by the
board to be at least equivalent to those of this state; or
(2) who presents evidence satisfactory to the board of having been
engaged in the practice of athletic training in another state, District of
Columbia, territory or foreign country and passed an examination in
athletic training by the national athletic trainers' association board of
certification, inc. or other recognized national voluntary credentialing
body, which examination the board finds is at least equivalent to the
examination approved by the board under K.S.A. 65-6907, and
amendments thereto, and who is certified by the national athletic
trainers' association board of certification, inc. or other recognized
national voluntary credentialing body, which certification the board
finds was issued based on standards at least equivalent to the standards
for licensure as an athletic trainer in this state; and
(3) who, at the time of making such application has not been

SENATE BILL No. 175—page 2
subject to discipline or does not have a disciplinary action pending
resulting from the practice of athletic training in another state, District
of Columbia, territory or foreign country; and
(4) who, at the time of making such application, pays to the board
a fee as prescribed, no part of which shall be returned.
(d) As a condition of performing the functions and duties of an
athletic trainer in this state, each licensed athletic trainer shall file a
practice protocol with the board. The practice protocol shall be signed
by each person licensed by the board to practice the healing arts who
will delegate to the athletic trainer acts which constitute athletic
training and shall contain such information as required by rules and
regulations adopted by the board.
(e) The board may issue a temporary permit to an applicant for
licensure as an athletic trainer who meets the requirements for licensure
as an athletic trainer as required by K.S.A. 65-6907, and amendments
thereto, or who meets all the requirements for licensure except
examination and who pays to the board the temporary permit fee as
required under K.S.A. 65-6910, and amendments thereto. Such
temporary permit shall expire six months from the date of issue or on
the date that the board approves or denies the application for licensure,
whichever occurs first. No more than one such temporary permit shall
be granted to any one person.
(f) An individual who accompanies an athletic team or
organization from another state or jurisdiction and provides the
services of an athletic trainer in Kansas is exempt from the licensure
requirements of the Kansas athletic trainers licensure act, provided
that the person is:
(1) Licensed and able to practice as an athletic trainer in another
state, District of Columbia, territory or foreign country; and
(2) limited to providing the services of an athletic trainer to
members of the athletic team or organization that traveled to Kansas.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 65-6907 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
6907. An applicant for licensure as an athletic trainer shall give proof
that the applicant has:
(a) Received a baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate degree with a
major course of study in an athletic training curriculumGraduated after
successful completion of the curriculum requirements of an accredited
athletic training education program at an accredited college or
university approved by the board; and
(b) passed an examination in athletic training approved by the
board.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 65-6902, 65-6906 and 65-6907 are hereby repealed.

SENATE BILL No. 175—page 3
Sec. 5. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
_________________________
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
________________________
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.